Utah statutes.
30-3-10.5.   Payments of support, maintenance, and alimony.
(1)  All monthly payments of support, maintenance, or alimony provided for in
the order or decree shall be due on the first day of each month for purposes
of Section 78B-12-112, child support services pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter
11, Part 3, Public Support of Child, income withholding services pursuant to
Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 4, Income Withholding in IV-D Cases, and other
income withholding procedures pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 5,
Income Withholding in Non IV-D Cases.
(2)  For purposes of child support services and income withholding pursuant to
Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 3 and Part  4, child support is not considered
past due until the first day of the following month.
(3)  For purposes other than those specified in Subsections (1) and (2),
support shall be payable 1/2 by the 5th day of each month and 1/2 by the 20th
day of that month, unless the order or decree provides for a different time
for payment.
